Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,131
Appeal; procedure.

Any final decision by the commission in a contested case or a declaratory ruling made pursuant to the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act may be appealed. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 131;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 91;

Laws 1991, LB 232, § 10.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

Advisory opinions of the Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission are not the equivalent of either of the matters appealable to the district court in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act identified in this section, to wit, contested cases or declaratory rulings, and therefore are not appealable under this section. Engler v. State, 283 Neb. 985, 814 N.W.2d 387 (2012).